Hawaii statutes.
§111-8.5 Reimbursement procedure. (a)
The state agency shall make a written demand for the amount due under this
chapter from any person responsible for a code violation. Such amount shall be
recoverable by the state agency in the same manner as a debt due.

(b) If the owner of real property from which
persons are forced to move because of code enforcement is the person
responsible for the code violation, and the owner fails to pay the state agency
within sixty days after written demand, the state agency may claim a lien
against the real property from which persons are displaced. This lien shall be
in addition to any other remedy the state agency may have. Such lien may be
foreclosed in the same manner as liens for state taxes and in accordance with sections
231-61 to 231-68.

(c) Payments in accordance with this section
to the state agency by the party responsible for the code violation shall not
relieve the party from complying with the notices ordering compliance with
codes issued by the state agency. [L 1973, c 67, §1(2); gen ch 1985; am L 1987,
c 10, §5 and c 162, §5; am L 1989, c 14, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next